Utah statutes.
76-10-1314.   Examination of testing procedures and results in legal
proceedings.
(1)  Employees of the laboratory who conduct laboratory analysis of blood
samples for presence of antibody to HIV provided pursuant to a request by a
law enforcement agency or the Department of Corrections under Section
76-10-1311, may be examined in a legal proceeding of any kind or character as
to:
(a)  the nature of the testing;
(b)  the validity of the testing;
(c)  the results of the test;
(d)  the HIV positivity or negativity of the person tested;
(e)  the evidentiary chain of custody; and
(f)  other factors relevant to the prosecution, subject to the court's ruling.
(2)  This section applies only to the criminal investigation and prosecution
under Section 76-10-1309 which permits enhanced penalties upon a subsequent
conviction for:
(a)  prostitution, Section 76-10-1302;
(b)  patronizing a prostitute, Section 76-10-1303; or
(c)  sexual solicitation, Section 76-10-1313.
